Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 49-143.8 of Title 11, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For purposes of this section the following definitions shall
apply:
1. "Initial COLA Benefit Date" means the latter of the member's
date of benefit commencement or May 27, 1983. This date is used in
the definition of Initial COLA Benefit and Target COLA Benefit;

Req. No. 13575 Page 1

RBH No. 13575
2. "Initial COLA Benefit" means the accrued retirement benefit
which will be used as the base benefit for determining the Target
COLA Benefit. The Initial COLA Benefit equals the benefit in
payment status as of the Initial COLA Benefit Date. Furthermore,
this benefit will reflect adjustment for military service credits,
if any, granted after the Initial COLA Benefit Date;
3. "CPI-U" means the Consumer Price Index for all urban
consumers for all goods and services, as published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics, U.S. Department of Labor. This is used as a
measure of price inflation for the development of the Target COLA
Benefit defined below; and
4. "Target COLA Benefit" is the Initial COLA Benefit adjusted
to reflect price inflation as measured by CPI-U. The Target COLA
Benefit is calculated for each eligible member to equal the member's
Initial COLA Benefit multiplied by a ratio of (A) divided by (B) as
follows:
(A) is the CPI-U as of July 1, 2025.
(B) is the CPI-U as of July 1 of the calendar year of the
Initial COLA Benefit Date; and
5. “Tweener” means a member, or their beneficiary, who was not
retired and did not have twenty (20) years of credited service as of
May 26, 1983, and who retired before November 1, 1989. Tweeners are
not eligible for an increase in benefits pursuant to repealed
Section 49-136 of this title and were not eligible to participate in
Req. No. 13575 Page 2

RBH No. 13575
the Oklahoma Firefighters Deferred Option Plan pursuant to Section
49-106.1 of this title.
B. The Board shall, effective July 1, 2025, implement a benefit
adjustment, to increase, if necessary, the retirement benefit for a
Tweener receiving benefits from the System as of June 30, 2025.
This benefit adjustment is intended to restore one hundred percent
(100%) of the loss of the Initial COLA Benefit, if any, due to price
inflation, as measured by CPI-U. The benefit adjustment shall be
one hundred percent (100%) of the amount by which the Target COLA
Benefit is in excess, if any, of the June 30, 2025, retirement
benefit.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 50-136.10 of Title 11, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. For purposes of this section the following definitions shall
apply:
1. "Initial COLA Benefit Date" means the latter of the member's
date of benefit commencement or May 26, 1983. This date is used in
the definition of Initial COLA Benefit and Target COLA Benefit;
2. "Initial COLA Benefit" means the accrued retirement benefit
which will be used as the base benefit for determining the Target
COLA Benefit. The Initial COLA Benefit equals the benefit in
payment status as of the Initial COLA Benefit Date. Furthermore,

Req. No. 13575 Page 3

RBH No. 13575
this benefit will reflect adjustment for military service credits,
if any, granted after the Initial COLA Benefit Date;
3. "CPI-U" means the Consumer Price Index for all urban
consumers for all goods and services, as published by the Bureau of
Labor Statistics, U.S. Department of Labor. This is used as a
measure of price inflation for the development of the Target COLA
Benefit defined below; and
4. "Target COLA Benefit" is the Initial COLA Benefit adjusted
to reflect price inflation as measured by CPI-U. The Target COLA
Benefit is calculated for each eligible member to equal the member's
Initial COLA Benefit multiplied by a ratio of (A) divided by (B) as
follows:
(A) is the CPI-U as of July 1, 2025.
(B) is the CPI-U as of July 1 of the calendar year of the
Initial COLA Benefit Date; and
5. “Tweener” means a member, or their beneficiary, who was not
retired and did not have twenty (20) years of credited service as of
May 25, 1983, and who retired before June 30, 1990. Tweeners are
not eligible for an increase in benefits pursuant to repealed
Section 50-120 of this title and were not eligible to participate in
the Oklahoma Police Deferred Option Plan pursuant to Section 50-
111.3 of this title.
B. The Board shall, effective July 1, 2025, implement a benefit
adjustment, to increase, if necessary, the retirement benefit for a
Req. No. 13575 Page 4

RBH No. 13575
Twee ner receiving benefits from the System as of June 30, 2025.
This benefit adjustment is intended to restore one hundred percent
(100%) of the loss of the Initial COLA Benefit, if any, due to price
inflation, as measured by CPI-U. The benefit adjustment shall be
one hundred percent (100%) of the amount by which the Target COLA
Benefit is in excess, if any, of the June 30, 2025, retirement
benefit.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-13575 CMA 04/29/25










Req. No. 13575 Page 5